Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2127.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-2351, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2351. License plate provided; design A. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall provide to every owner one license plate for each vehicle registered. At the request of the owner and on payment of a fee in an amount prescribed by the director by rule, the department shall provide one additional license plate for a vehicle for which a special plate is requested pursuant to this chapter. B. The license plate shall display the number assigned to the vehicle and to the owner of the vehicle and the name of this state, which may be abbreviated. The director shall coat the license plate with a reflective material that is consistent with the determination of the department regarding the color and design of license plates and special plates. The director shall design the license plate and the letters and numerals on the license plate to be of sufficient size to be plainly readable during daylight from a distance of one hundred feet. In addition to the standard license plate issued for a trailer before August 12, 2005, the director shall issue a license plate for trailers that has a design that is similar to the standard size license plate for trailers but that is the same size as the license plate for motorcycles. The trailer owner shall notify the department which size license plate the owner wants for the trailer. C. In addition to the requirements prescribed in subsection B of this section, for all license plates, including all special plates, that are designed or redesigned on or after September 24, 2022: 1. The background color of the license plate shall contrast significantly with the color of the letters and numerals on the license plate and with the name of this state on the license plate. 2. The name of this state shall appear on the license plate in capital letters in sans serif font and be three-fourths of an inch in height. D. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not contract with a nongovernmental entity to purchase or secure reflective material for the plates issued by the department unless the department has made a reasonable effort to secure qualified bids or proposals from as many individual responsible respondents as possible. E. The department shall determine the color and design of the license plate subject to the requirements prescribed by subsections B and C of this section. All plates issued by the department, except the plates that are issued pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2412, 28-2413, 28-2414, 28-2416, 28-2416.01, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.61, 28-2472, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, 28-2476, 28-2477, 28-2478 and 28-4533 and article 14 of this chapter, shall be the same color as and similar in design to the license plate as determined by the department. F. A passenger motor vehicle that is rented without a driver shall receive the same type of license plate as is issued for a private passenger motor vehicle. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-2403, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2403. Special plates; transfers; violation; classification A. Except as otherwise provided in this article, the department shall issue or renew special plates in lieu of the regular license plates pursuant to the following conditions and procedures and only if the requirements prescribed by this article for the requested special plates are met: 1. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, a person who is the registered owner of a vehicle registered with the department or who applies for an original or renewal registration of a vehicle may submit to the department a completed application form as prescribed by the department with the fee prescribed by section 28-2402 for special plates in addition to the registration fee prescribed by section 28-2003. 2. Except for plates issued pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2412, 28-2413, 28-2414, 28-2416, 28-2416.01, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.61, 28-2472, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, and 28-2476, 28-2477 and 28-2478 and article 14 of this chapter, the special plates shall be the same color as and similar to the design of the regular license plates that is determined by the department. 3. Except as provided in section 28-2416, the department shall issue special plates only to the owner or lessee of a vehicle that is currently registered, including any vehicle that has a declared gross weight, as defined in section 28-5431, of twenty-six thousand pounds or less. 4. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, the department shall charge the fee prescribed by section 28-2402 for each annual renewal of special plates in addition to the registration fee prescribed by section 28-2003. B. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, on notification to the department and on payment of the transfer fee prescribed by section 28-2402, a person who is issued special plates may transfer the special plates to another vehicle the person owns or leases. Persons who are issued special plates for hearing impaired persons pursuant to section 28-2408 and international symbol of access special plates pursuant to section 28-2409 are exempt from the transfer fee. If a person who is issued special plates sells, trades or otherwise releases ownership of the vehicle on which the plates have been displayed, the person shall immediately report the transfer of the plates to the department or the person shall surrender the plates to the department as prescribed by the director. It is unlawful for a person to whom the plates have been issued to knowingly allow them to be displayed on a vehicle except the vehicle authorized by the department. C. The special plates shall be affixed to the vehicle for which registration is sought in lieu of the regular license plates. D. A person is guilty of a class 3 misdemeanor who: 1. Violates subsection B of this section. 2. Fraudulently gives false or fictitious information in the application for or renewal of special plates or placards issued pursuant to this article. 3. Conceals a material fact or otherwise commits fraud in the application for or renewal of special plates or placards issued pursuant to this article. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 28, chapter 7, article 12, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 28-2470.40, 28-2470.41, 28-2470.42, 28-2470.43, 28-2470.44, 28-2470.45, 28-2470.46, 28-2470.47, 28-2470.48, 28-2470.49, 28-2470.50, 28-2470.51, 28-2470.52, 28-2470.53, 28-2470.54, 28-2470.55, 28-2470.56, 28-2470.57, 28-2470.58, 28-2470.59, 28-2470.60 and 28-2470.61, to read: START_STATUTE28-2470.40. Skin cancer prevention special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue skin cancer prevention special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the skin cancer prevention special plates. The design and color of the skin cancer prevention special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for skin cancer prevention special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the skin cancer prevention special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the skin cancer prevention special plate fund established by this section. D. The skin cancer prevention special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in this state and been INCORPORATED in this state since 2011. 2. Provide skin cancer prevention education, preventative EXAMINATIONS, sun protection and HYGIENE products to promote skin cancer prevention awareness and education in this state, including: (a) at school resource fairs for low-income students and families. (b) to persons with physical disabilities and chronic illnesses, including persons with transportation barriers. (c) to persons living in shelters and affordable housing developments. (d) at churches. (e) at businesses. (f) for municipal entities. (g) at community events. 3. Arrange for the construction of permanent sun shade structures at schools, churches and community parks for protection from heat and from sun DAMAGE. 4. Have a mission to ORGANIZE volunteer medical professionals and medical residents and other community volunteers and medical school, COLLEGE and high school students to promote skin cancer prevention awareness and education at community events and to improve the quality of life in both urban and rural areas in this state. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.41. Diabetes awareness special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue diabetes awareness special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the diabetes awareness special plates. The design and color of the diabetes awareness special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for diabetes awareness special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the diabetes awareness special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the diabetes awareness special plate fund established by this section. D. The diabetes awareness special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. have been founded in 2022 and be headquartered in this state. 2. Support persons who are living with diabetes and their families through a support NETWORK crafted by diabetics. 3. Provide education and resources to inform the general public about diabetes. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.42. Small business advocate special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue small business advocate special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the small business advocate special plates. The design and color of the small business advocate special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for small business advocate special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the small business advocate special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the small business advocate special plate fund established by this section. D. The small business advocate special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(6) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in this state. 2. Have been in existence for at least fifty years. 3. Serve as a statewide nonpartisan advocate and resource hub for small businesses in this state. 4. Provide education resources to entrepreneurs, including workshops, mentorship programs and events that are designed to provide relevant knowledge and skills. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.43. Grand Canyon preservation special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue Grand Canyon preservation special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the Grand Canyon preservation special plates. The design and color of the Grand Canyon preservation special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for Grand Canyon preservation special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the Grand Canyon preservation special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the Grand Canyon preservation special plate fund established by this section. D. The Grand Canyon preservation special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Fundraise, operate retail shops that are located in this state and in the Grand Canyon national park and provide educational programs about the natural and cultural history of the Grand Canyon region. 2. Use fundraising monies to fund projects that are located in this state and in the Grand Canyon national park, including trail creation, and maintenance, historic building preservation, educational programs for the public and protection of wildlife and natural habitats. 3. Assist the Grand Canyon national park by providing enriching visitor experiences and protecting the Grand Canyon national park for future generations. 4. Advocate for the protection of the Grand Canyon national park. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.44. Recycling refurbished electronics special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE recycling refurbished electronics SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. RESPONSIBLY collect ELECTRONIC waste located in this state. 2. Refurbish and distribute computing and communication devices to residents of this state. 3. Educate and provide workforce development. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.45. Adaptive sports and recreation special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue adaptive sports and recreation special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the adaptive sports and recreation special plates. The design and color of the adaptive sports and recreation special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for adaptive sports and recreation special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the adaptive sports and recreation special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the adaptive sports and recreation special plate fund established by this section. D. The adaptive sports and recreation special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. have been founded in 2018. 2. provide adaptive equipment for water sports and train volunteers to assist persons with physical or cognitive disabilities regardless of age to access water sports throughout this state, including waterskiing, wakeboarding, wakesurfing, kayaking, fishing, boating and tubing. 3. Promote physical wellness, emotional healing and a sense of belonging. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.46. Blood and biologics special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue blood and biologics special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the blood and biologics special plates. The design and color of the blood and biologics special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for blood and biologics special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the blood and biologics special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the blood and biologics special plate fund established by this section. D. The blood and biologics special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Secure and steward charitable gifts to connect blood and biologics donors with recipients. 2. Use financial contributions and gifts to improve lives by providing essential blood products, clinical services, medical consultation and innovative research. 3. Engage with sponsors for community blood drives and mobile bloodmobiles. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.47. Astronomy center special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue astronomy center special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the astronomy center special plates. The design and color of the astronomy center special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for astronomy center special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the astronomy center special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the astronomy center special plate fund established by this section. D. The astronomy center special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be governed by an independent board of trustees. 2. Manage long-term endowment goals or short-term targeted donations for An observatory that pursues the study of astronomy in this state. 3. Support the work of an astronomy observatory located in the Flagstaff area. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.48. Law enforcement charity organization special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue law enforcement charity organization special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the law enforcement charity organization special plates. The design and color of the law enforcement charity organization special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for law enforcement charity organization special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the law enforcement charity organization special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the law enforcement charity organization special plate fund established by this section. D. The law enforcement charity organization special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. support law ENFORCEMENT officers who serve in a city with a population of more than one million persons. 2. Provide employee assistance, benevolence assistance and scholarships to members of law enforcement. 3. create a cycle of support that benefits both law enforcement and the broader community. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.49. Law enforcement support special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue law enforcement support special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the law enforcement support special plates. The design and color of the law enforcement support special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for law enforcement support special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the law enforcement support special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the law enforcement support special plate fund established by this section. D. The law enforcement support special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection A of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Collect and distribute donations to families of fallen or injured law enforcement officers in this state through a memorial fund. 2. Fundraise for support of law enforcement operational units, including canine and mounted units. 3. Engage in community fundraising and events, including annual toy drives, commemorative merchandise and car wash fundraisers. 4. For new membership in the entity, require sponsorship by a current member. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.50. Search and rescue special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue search and rescue special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the search and rescue special plates. The design and color of the search and rescue special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for search and rescue special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the search and rescue special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the search and rescue special plate fund established by this section. D. The search and rescue special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have been established in the 1980s. 2. Support arizona sheriffs in fulfilling the sheriff's statutory search and rescue RESPONSIBILITIES. 3. Develop training standards, ENHANCE search techniques and PROMOTE consistency AMONG search and rescue volunteers, county coordinators and supporting agencies across this state. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.51. Returning warrior special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue returning warrior special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the returning warrior special plates. The design and color of the returning warrior special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for returning warrior special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the returning warrior special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the returning warrior special plate fund established by this section. D. The returning warrior special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have started a program in 2005 to financially assist veterans who are EXPERIENCING difficulty meeting basic needs to transition back into the civilian community. 2. Provide veterans with COMMUNITY assistance. 3. Help veterans coordinate with veterans affairs facilities. 4. Support mental health initiatives for veterans. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.52. Community well-being special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue community well-being special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the community well-being special plates. The design and color of the community well-being special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for community well-being special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the community well-being special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the community well-being special plate fund established by this section. D. The community well-being special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must have: 1. a MISSION to strengthening the COMMUNITY BY connecting all PEOPLE to their potential and purpose. 2. programs for persons of every age and life stage. 3. at least fifteen centers across this state. 4. been in existence for over one hundred twenty years. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.53. Historic electric vehicle special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue historic electric vehicle special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the historic electric vehicle special plates. The design and color of the historic electric vehicle special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for historic electric vehicle special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the historic electric vehicle special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the historic electric vehicle special plate fund established by this section. D. The historic electric vehicle special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have a mission to inspire a shift to sustainably powered electric transportation. 2. provide an interactive EXPERIENCE for VISITORS. 3. Showcase the history of electric vehicles through a large collection of HISTORIC electric vehicles. 4. Have been in EXISTENCE since 2014. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.54. Kindness charity special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue kindness charity special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the kindness charity special plates. The design and color of the kindness charity special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for kindness charity special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the kindness charity special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the kindness charity special plate fund established by this section. D. The kindness charity special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. have Been in EXISTENCE since 2003. 2. have At least one thousand active members who volunteer with the organization. 3. have A mission to inspire people of this state to practice intentional kindness through art, education and community connection. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.55. Elk and other wildlife special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue elk and other wildlife special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the elk and other wildlife special plates. The design and color of the elk and other wildlife special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for elk and other wildlife special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the elk and other wildlife special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the elk and other wildlife special plate fund established by this section. D. The elk and other wildlife special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Engage with volunteers and contractors to maintain and restore habitat and wildlife water projects across this state. 2. Coordinate and manage youth programs, including conservation, hunting and outdoor activities. 3. Facilitate big game and other outdoor experiences for Arizona's wounded veterans. 4. Conduct outreach and cultivate partnerships to promote and advocate for public education regarding wildlife policies, biology-based habitat management and land stewardship. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.56. Youth education charity special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue youth education charity special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the youth education charity special plates. The design and color of the youth education charity special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for youth education charity special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the youth education charity special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the youth education charity special plate fund established by this section. D. The youth education charity special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in the city of scottsdale. 2. Have been incorporated in 1986. 3. consist of members who support the organization monetarily or through regular volunteer activities. 4. Provide grants to nonprofits in Maricopa county and provide scholarships, grants and programming to public education school and students. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.57. Police service dogs special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue police service dogs special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the police service dogs special plates. The design and color of the police service dogs special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for police service dogs special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the police service dogs special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the police service dogs special plate fund established by this section. D. The police service dogs special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Have a membership consisting of police service dog handlers and trainers. 2. Promote and assist in the use of police service dogs in the prevention and detection of crime. 3. Promote educational programs relating to the use of police service dogs. 4. Provide assistance to law enforcement AGENCIES that wish to IMPLEMENT police service dogs. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.58. Golf tournament charity special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE golf tournament charity SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. Have been established after 1966. 2. Oversee the OPERATIONS and sales arm of a professional golfers' association tour event. 3. Be COMPRISED of over fifty active business and PROFESSIONAL members. 4. Promote and fund local youth ATHLETIC programs in the TUCSON area. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.59. Distracted driving special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE distracted driving SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. Have a mission of raising awareness about the dangers of distracted driving. 2. Have a goal of educating, empowering and protecting drivers, passengers and PEDESTRIANS by PROMOTING focused and responsible driving habits. 3. Conduct community outreach and public campaigns and provide PROGRAMS to reduce traffic accidents caused by cell phones, fatigue and other distractions while driving. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.60. Public education foundation special plates; fund A. IF, BY DECEMBER 31, 2026, A PERSON PAYS $32,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES. THE PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE $32,000 SHALL DESIGN THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES. THE DESIGN AND COLOR OF THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT. THE DIRECTOR MAY ALLOW A REQUEST FOR public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES TO BE COMBINED WITH A REQUEST FOR PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES. IF THE DIRECTOR ALLOWS SUCH A COMBINATION, THE REQUEST SHALL BE IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DIRECTOR AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FEES FOR THE PERSONALIZED SPECIAL PLATES IN ADDITION TO THE FEES REQUIRED FOR THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATES. B. OF THE $25 FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 28-2402 FOR THE ORIGINAL SPECIAL PLATES AND FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE SPECIAL PLATES, $8 IS A SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEE AND $17 IS AN ANNUAL DONATION. C. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT, PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 35-146 AND 35-147, ALL SPECIAL PLATE ADMINISTRATION FEES IN THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 28-6991 AND SHALL TRANSMIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATE FUND ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION. D. THE public education foundation SPECIAL PLATE FUND IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES DEPOSITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND. THE FIRST $32,000 IN THE FUND SHALL BE REIMBURSED TO THE PERSON THAT PAID THE IMPLEMENTATION FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE MONIES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ANNUALLY SHALL BE USED FOR THE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE FUND. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED. E. THE DIRECTOR SHALL ANNUALLY ALLOCATE MONIES FROM THE FUND TO AN ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED UNDER SECTION 501(c)(3) OF THE UNITED STATES INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. THE ENTITY MUST: 1. shine a spotlight on the work and EDUCATION of public school EDUCATORS, staff and administrators through programs including the A+ school of excellence and teacher of the year. 2. Support pathways to EXCELLENCE with ACADEMIC programs for students and training for teachers and ADMINISTRATORS through programs, including support for the spelling bee, science, technology, engineering and MATHEMATICS teachers and leadership programs for principals. 3. Have a belief that public education is a great equalizer that gives all students the chance at a high-quality education and SUCCESSFUL future. F. ON NOTICE FROM THE DIRECTOR, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND DIVEST MONIES IN THE FUND AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 35-313, AND MONIES EARNED FROM INVESTMENT SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE FUND. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2470.61. Grand Canyon national park special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue Grand Canyon national park special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the Grand Canyon national park special plates. The design and color of the Grand Canyon national park special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for Grand Canyon national park special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the Grand Canyon national park special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of the special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the Grand Canyon national park special plate fund established by this section. D. The Grand Canyon national park special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the person that paid the implementation fee to the department pursuant to subsection a of this section. Not more than ten percent of the monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. The director shall annually allocate monies from the fund to an entity that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The entity must: 1. Be headquartered in this state. 2. Have operated in this state for over twenty consecutive years. 3. Be an OFFICIAL philanthropic partner of the Grand Canyon national park. F. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 28, chapter 7, article 13, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 28-2477 and 28-2478, to read: START_STATUTE28-2477. Bronze star medal license plates; fees A. From and after December 31, 2026, The department shall issue distinctive license plates to: 1. A person who submits satisfactory proof to the department that the person is a veteran and a bona fide bronze star medal recipient. 2. An immediate family member of a person who has been issued a license plate pursuant to this section. b. For each original license plate issued pursuant to this section, the department shall collect a fee of $25 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003. For each annual renewal of license plates issued pursuant to this section, the department shall charge a fee of $5 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003.  The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the $25 fee as a donation in the veterans' donations fund established by section 41-608. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-2478. Silver star medal license plates; fees A. From and after December 31, 2026, The department shall issue distinctive license plates to: 1. A person who submits satisfactory proof to the department that the person is a veteran and a bona fide Silver star medal recipient. 2. An immediate family member of a person who has been issued a license plate pursuant to this section. b. For each original license plate issued pursuant to this section, the department shall collect a fee of $25 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003. For each annual renewal of license plates issued pursuant to this section, the department shall charge a fee of $5 in addition to the registration fee required by section 28-2003. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the $25 fee as a donation in the veterans' donations fund established by section 41-608.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 28-6501, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-6501. Definition of highway user revenues In this article, unless the context otherwise requires or except as otherwise provided by statute, "highway user revenues" means all monies received in this state from licenses, taxes, penalties, interest and fees authorized by the following: 1. Chapters 2, 7, 8 and 15 of this title, except for: (a) The special plate administration fees prescribed in sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.61 and 28-2514. (b) The donations prescribed in sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2415, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.61, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, and 28-2476, 28-2477 and 28-2478. 2. Section 28-1177. 3. Chapters 10 and 11 of this title. 4. Chapter 16, articles 1, 2 and 4 of this title, except as provided in sections 28-5926 and 28-5927. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 28-6991, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-6991. State highway fund; sources The state highway fund is established that consists of: 1. Monies distributed from the Arizona highway user revenue fund pursuant to chapter 18 of this title. 2. Monies appropriated by the legislature. 3. Monies received from donations for the construction, improvement or maintenance of state highways or bridges. These monies shall be credited to a special account and shall be spent only for the purpose indicated by the donor. 4. Monies received from counties or cities under cooperative agreements, including proceeds from bond issues. The state treasurer shall deposit these monies to the credit of the fund in a special account on delivery to the treasurer of a concise written agreement between the department and the county or city stating the purposes for which the monies are surrendered by the county or city, and these monies shall be spent only as stated in the agreement. 5. Monies received from the United States under an act of Congress to provide aid for the construction of rural post roads, but monies received on projects for which the monies necessary to be provided by this state are wholly derived from sources mentioned in paragraphs 2 and 3 of this section shall be allotted by the department and deposited by the state treasurer in the special account within the fund established for each project. On completion of the project, on the satisfaction and discharge in full of all obligations of any kind created and on request of the department, the treasurer shall transfer the unexpended balance in the special account for the project into the state highway fund, and the unexpended balance and any further federal aid thereafter received on account of the project may be spent under the general provisions of this title. 6. Monies in the custody of an officer or agent of this state from any source that is to be used for the construction, improvement or maintenance of state highways or bridges. 7. Monies deposited in the state general fund and arising from the disposal of state personal property belonging to the department. 8. Receipts from the sale or disposal of any or all other property held by the department and purchased with state highway monies. 9. Monies generated pursuant to section 28-410. 10. Monies distributed pursuant to section 28-5808, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (d). 11. Monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-1143, 28-2353 and 28-3003. 12. Except as provided in section 28-5101, the following monies: (a) Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2206 and section 28-5808, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (e). (b) $1 of each registration fee and $1 of each title fee collected pursuant to section 28-2003. (c) $2 of each late registration penalty collected by the director pursuant to section 28-2162. (d) The air quality compliance fee collected pursuant to section 49-542. (e) The special plate administration fees collected pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2416, 28-2416.01, 28-2417 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.61 and 28-2514. (f) Monies collected pursuant to sections 28-372, 28-2155 and 28-2156 if the director is the registering officer. 13. Monies deposited pursuant to chapter 5, article 5 of this title. 14. Donations received pursuant to section 28-2269. 15. Dealer and registration monies collected pursuant to section 28-4304. 16. Abandoned vehicle administration monies deposited pursuant to section 28-4804. 17. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-710, subsection D, paragraph 2. 18. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2065. 19. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-7311. 20. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-7059. 21. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-1105. 22. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2448, subsection D. 23. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-3415. 24. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-3002, subsection A, paragraph 14. 25. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-7316. 26. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-4302. 27. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-3416. 28. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-4504. 29. Monies deposited pursuant to section 28-2098. 30. Monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-2321, 28-2324, 28-2325, 28-5474, 28-5739, 28-5863 and 28-5864.END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 28-6993, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-6993. State highway fund; authorized uses A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section and section 28-6538, the state highway fund shall be used for any of the following purposes in strict conformity with and subject to the budget as provided by this section and by sections 28-6997 through 28-7003: 1. To pay salaries, wages, necessary travel expenses and other expenses of officers and employees of the department and the incidental office expenses, including telegraph, telephone, postal and express charges and printing, stationery and advertising expenses. 2. To pay for both: (a) Equipment, supplies, machines, tools, department offices and laboratories established by the department. (b) The construction and repair of buildings or yards of the department. 3. To pay the cost of both: (a) Engineering, construction, improvement and maintenance of state highways and parts of highways forming state routes. (b) Highways under cooperative agreements with the United States that are entered into pursuant to this chapter and an act of Congress providing for the construction of rural post roads. 4. To pay land damages incurred by reason of establishing, opening, altering, relocating, widening or abandoning portions of a state route or state highway. 5. To reimburse the department revolving account. 6. To pay premiums on authorized indemnity bonds and on compensation insurance under the workers' compensation act. 7. To defray lawful expenses and costs required to administer and carry out the intent, purposes and provisions of this title, including repayment of obligations entered into pursuant to this title, payment of interest on obligations entered into pursuant to this title, repayment of loans and other financial assistance, including repayment of advances and interest on advances made to the department pursuant to section 28-7677, and payment of all other obligations and expenses of the board and department pursuant to chapter 21 of this title. 8. To pay lawful bills and charges incurred by the state engineer. 9. To acquire, construct or improve entry roads to state parks or roads within state parks. 10. To acquire, construct or improve entry roads to state prisons. 11. To pay the cost of relocating a utility facility pursuant to section 28-7156. 12. For the purposes provided in subsections C, D and E of this section and sections 28-1143, 28-2353 and 28-3003. 13. To pay the cost of issuing an Arizona centennial special plate pursuant to section 28-2448. 14. To pay for all of the following: (a) The enforcement by the department of public safety and the department of transportation of vehicle safety requirements within twenty-five miles of the border between this state and Mexico. (b) Costs related to procuring electronic equipment, automated systems or improvements to existing electronic equipment or automated systems for relieving vehicle congestion at ports of entry on the border between this state and Mexico. (c) Constructing, maintaining and upgrading transportation facilities, including roads, streets and highways, approved by the board within twenty-five miles of the border between this state and Mexico. (d) As approved by the board, constructing and maintaining transportation facilities in the CANAMEX high priority corridor as defined in section 332 of the national highway system designation act of 1995 (P.L. 104-59; 109 Stat. 568). (e) Activities of the department that include collecting transportation and trade data in the United States and Mexico for the purposes of constructing transportation facilities, improving public safety, improving truck processing time and relieving congestion at ports of entry on the border between this state and Mexico. The department may enter into an agreement with the Arizona-Mexico commission and provide funding to the commission for the purposes of this subdivision. (f) A commitment or investment necessary for the department or another agency of this state to obtain federal monies that are designated for expenditure pursuant to this section. B. For each fiscal year, the department of transportation shall allocate and transfer monies in the state highway fund to the department of public safety for funding a portion of highway patrol costs in eight installments in each of the first eight months of a fiscal year that do not exceed $10,000,000. C. Subject to legislative appropriation, the department may use the monies in the state highway fund as prescribed in section 28-6991, paragraph 12 to carry out the duties imposed by this title for registration or titling of vehicles, to operate joint title, registration and driver licensing offices, to cover the administrative costs of issuing the air quality compliance sticker, modifying the year validating tab and issuing the windshield sticker and to cover expenses and costs in issuing special plates pursuant to sections 28-2404, 28-2407, 28-2412 through 28-2470.39 28-2470.61 and 28-2514. D. The department shall use monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to chapter 5, article 5 of this title only as prescribed by that article. E. Monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-2269 shall be used only as prescribed by that section. F. Monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-710, subsection D, paragraph 2 shall only be used for state highway work zone traffic control devices. G. The department may exchange monies distributed to the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-6538, subsection A, paragraph 1 for local government surface transportation program federal monies suballocated to councils of government and metropolitan planning organizations if the local government scheduled to receive the federal monies concurs. An exchange of state highway fund monies pursuant to this subsection shall be in an amount that is at least equal to ninety percent of the federal obligation authority that exists in the project for which the exchange is proposed. H. The department shall use monies deposited in the state highway fund pursuant to section 28-1105, subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (a) only for a transportation facility that is located within twenty drivable miles of the international port of entry and shall spend the monies proportionally based on the amount of total monies collected pursuant to section 28-1105, subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (a). For the purposes of this subsection, "transportation facility" means a highway or a state route or a county, city or town road that is used by a commercial vehicle or a commercial vehicle combination for which an axle fee is paid pursuant to section 28-5474.END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 41-608, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-608. Veterans' donations fund; transfer; grants A. The veterans' donations fund is established consisting of monies, gifts and contributions donated to the department and monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-2414, 28-2428, 28-2431, 28-2447, 28-2454, 28-2470.10, 28-2473, 28-2474, 28-2475, 28-2476, 28-2477, 28-2478 and 43-620. The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. The monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. The department shall annually transfer fifteen percent of all revenues received by the department that are deposited in the veterans' donations fund pursuant to this section to the subaccount established pursuant to section 41-608.01 in the state homes for veterans trust fund. The department shall adopt rules or policies for grants of less than $5,000 that encourage as much competition as practicable. B. The director or the director's designee may solicit and receive donations, including in-kind donations, from the public for veterans. The director shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the monetary donations in the veterans' donations fund. Monies in the fund are subject to state auditing procedures. Except for monies deposited pursuant to sections 28-2431 and 28-2447, the donations may be used for the benefit of the veterans within this state as grants, subject to chapter 24 of this title, if applicable. C. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2431, subsection C. The monies in the subaccount shall be used for the construction and maintenance of the enduring freedom memorial authorized pursuant to section 41-1363 for placement in Wesley Bolin Plaza. D. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2447, subsection F. The monies in the subaccount shall be used for the benefit of women veterans in this state, including providing shelter to homeless women veterans as grants, subject to chapter 24 of this title, if applicable. E. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2454, subsection C. The first $32,000 in the subaccount shall be reimbursed to the person that provides the $32,000 pursuant to section 28-2454, subsection A. The director shall annually allocate monies from the subaccount to a foundation that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes and that is the nation's oldest and largest provider of need-based scholarships to children of United States military members. The foundation must: 1. Have been in existence for at least fifty-two years. 2. Have provided more than thirty-three thousand scholarships that are valued at almost $90,000,000. 3. Have a mission that includes honoring marines and educating their children. 4. Award scholarship monies to children of marines and navy corpsmen who were killed or wounded in combat or who have demonstrated financial need. F. The director shall establish a separate subaccount in the veterans' donations fund for the deposit of monies received pursuant to section 28-2470.10, subsection C. The first $32,000 in the subaccount shall be reimbursed to the person that provides the $32,000 pursuant to section 28-2470.10, subsection A. The director shall annually allocate monies from the subaccount to a foundation that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code for federal income tax purposes. The foundation must: 1. Have been in existence for at least twenty years. 2. Have a mission that includes providing college scholarships to: (a) The sons and daughters of those who have served the United States honorably as soldiers in the United States army. (b) The spouses of enlisted soldiers on active duty in the United States army. 3. Envision increasing its fundraising and visibility to encourage more applicants to apply for scholarships and to provide larger scholarships to an increasing number of deserving applicants to both: (a) Reward army families for the sacrifices that army soldiers make every day to serve their nation. (b) Help the spouses and children of army soldiers become leaders in society. 4. Award scholarship monies to: (a) Children of former United States army members who were killed while serving in the United States army or who received an honorable discharge or medical discharge. (b) Children of United States army members in good standing serving in regular active duty, active duty reserve or active duty national guard. (c) Spouses of United States army members in good standing serving in regular active duty, active duty reserve or active duty national guard. G. The director shall inventory and account for the use of any tangible personal property donated to the fund. H. The department may use up to $150,000 from the veterans' donations fund each fiscal year to administer this section. In addition to any other full-time equivalent positions authorized by law, the department is authorized two full-time equivalent positions to administer this section. I. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE